Virginia statutes. Title 33.2. Highways and Other Surface Transportation Systems.
Article 2. Commonwealth Transportation Board; Powers and Duties.

§ 33.2-208.
Location of routes.

The Board shall have the power and duty to locate and establish the routes to be followed by the highways comprising the systems of state highways between the points designated in the establishment of such systems, except that such routes shall not include highways or streets located within any local system of highways or streets, within the urban highway system, or those local highways in any county that has resumed full responsibility for all of the secondary state highway system within such county’s boundaries pursuant to §

33.2-342

. Such routes to be located and established shall include corridors of statewide significance pursuant to §

33.2-353

.

The Board shall not locate and establish any route pursuant to this section until the Department has (i) published in a newspaper that is published or has a general circulation in the locality in which the route is to be located and established a notice of its willingness to hold a public hearing on the matter, (ii) notified the governing body of the locality in which the route is to be located of its willingness to hold a public hearing on the matter, and (iii) held a public hearing if one has been requested.If a public hearing is requested, written notice of the time and place of the hearing shall be given not less than 30 days prior to the hearing to the governing body of the locality in which the route is to be located and established. Not less than 30 days prior to the hearing, a notice of the time and place of the hearing shall also be published by the Department at least once in a newspaper published or having a general circulation in the locality in which the route is to be located and established.All public hearings on the location or possible location of a route shall be open forums that afford citizens opportunities to obtain route location information and other pertinent information on a proposed project and to submit their hearing comments in writing or to present them directly to a verbatim recorder. In addition, upon the written request of a member of the governing body of the locality in which the route is proposed to be located, or upon the written request of 25 citizens, these public hearings shall afford citizens an opportunity to present their comments to representatives of the Department directly, one speaker at a time, in a public forum following a traditional hearing format. A written request for a traditional hearing must be received within 14 days following the first published notice of the hearing or willingness to hold a hearing.Following the public hearing, if one is held as provided in this section, the Department shall notify the governing body of the affected locality of the Board’s decision regarding the location and establishment of the route.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-12, 33-17; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-12, 33.1-18; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, cc. 44, 167; 1995, c. 94; 2000, c. 489; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to comprehensive plan prepared and adopted by local planning commission, see §

15.2-2223

.

§ 33.2-209.
Construction and maintenance contracts and activities related to passenger and freight rail and public transportation.

The Board shall have the power and duty to let all contracts to be administered by the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation for the construction, maintenance, and improvement of the highways comprising systems of state highways and for all activities related to passenger and freight rail and public transportation in excess of $5 million. The Commissioner of Highways has authority to let all Department of Transportation-administered contracts for highway construction, maintenance, and improvements up to $5 million in value. The Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation has the authority to let contracts for passenger and freight rail and public transportation improvements up to $5 million in value. The Commissioner of Highways is authorized to enter into agreements with localities, authorities, and transportation districts to administer projects and to allow those localities, authorities, and transportation districts to let contracts with no limit on contract value and without prior concurrence of the Commissioner of Highways or the Board for highway construction, maintenance, and improvements within their jurisdictions, in accordance with those provisions of this Code providing those localities, authorities, and transportation districts the ability to let such contracts. The Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation is authorized to enter into agreements with localities, authorities, and transportation districts to administer projects and to allow those localities, authorities, and transportation districts to let contracts with no limit on contract value and without prior concurrence of the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation or the Board for passenger and freight rail and public transportation activities within their jurisdictions, in accordance with those provisions of this Code providing those localities, authorities, and transportation districts the ability to let such contracts. The Commissioner of Highways and the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation shall report on their respective transportation contracting activities at least quarterly to the Board.

The Board may award contracts for the construction of transportation projects on a design-build basis. These contracts may be awarded after a written determination is made by the Commissioner of Highways or the Director of the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, pursuant to objective criteria previously adopted by the Board regarding the use of design-build, that delivery of the projects must be expedited and that it is not in the public interest to comply with the design and construction contracting procedures normally followed. Such objective criteria shall include requirements for prequalification of contractors and competitive bidding processes. These contracts shall be of such size and scope to encourage maximum competition and participation by agency prequalified and otherwise qualified contractors. Such determination shall be retained for public inspection in the official records of the Department of Transportation or the Department of Rail and Public Transportation, as the case may be, and shall include a description of the nature and scope of the project and the reasons for the Commissioner’s or the Director’s determination that awarding a design-build contract will best serve the public interest. A Request for Proposal for transportation projects to be delivered on a design-build basis pursuant to this section may allow for the submission and consideration of alternative technical concepts in accordance with the procedures set forth in such Request for Proposal. The provisions of this section shall supersede contrary provisions of subsection D of §

2.2-4303

.For the purposes of this subsection, “alternative technical concepts” means proposed changes to agency-supplied base design configurations, project scope, design, or construction criteria that provide a solution that is equal to or better than the requirements in the Request for Proposal.

The Board may award contracts for the provision of equipment, materials, and supplies to be used in construction of transportation projects on a fixed-price basis. Any such contract may provide that the price to be paid for the provision of equipment, materials, and supplies to be furnished in connection with the projects shall not be increased but shall remain fixed until completion of the projects specified in the contracts. Material components of any such contract for annual and multiyear programs, including maintenance, may be fixed at the outset of the projects and until completion based on best achievable prices.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-12; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-12; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805; 2016, cc. 139, 369; 2017, cc. 699, 704.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendments by cc. 139 and 369 are identical, and in subsection B, inserted “A Request for Proposal for transportation projects to be delivered on a design-build basis pursuant to this section may allow for the submission and consideration of alternative technical concepts in accordance with the procedures set forth in such Request for Proposal” in the first paragraph and added the second paragraph.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 699 and 704 are identical, and deleted “and §

2.2-4306

” at the end of the first paragraph in subsection B.

§ 33.2-210.
Traffic regulations; penalty.

The Board shall have the power and duty to make regulations that are not in conflict with the laws of the Commonwealth for the protection of and covering traffic on and for the use of systems of state highways and shall have the authority to add to, amend, or repeal such regulations.

The regulations, together with any additions or amendments thereto, prescribed by the Board under the authority of this section shall have the force and effect of law, and any person, firm, or corporation violating any such regulation or any addition or amendment thereto is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by a fine of not less than $5 nor more than $100 for each offense. Such person shall be civilly liable to the Commonwealth for the actual damage sustained by the Commonwealth by reason of his wrongful act. Such damages may be recovered at the suit of the Board and, when collected, paid into the state treasury to the credit of the Department. Any regulations promulgated by the Board shall be developed in accordance with the Administrative Process Act (§

2.2-4000

et seq.) except when specifically exempted by law.

History.

Code 1950, §§ 33-12, 33-18; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, §§ 33.1-12, 33.1-19; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2010, cc. 17, 51; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805.

Cross references.

As to penalty for hauling certain cargoes through tunnels or on highways, see § 46.2-815.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, c. 466, cl. 1 provides: “§ 1. That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall amend its regulations so as to permit mobile food vending on state highway rights-of-way except limited access highways. Such regulations may provide for the issuance of permits by the Department of Transportation to mobile food vendors authorizing such vendors to operate on state highway rights-of-way in certain business districts, urban development areas, or areas zoned for commercial use and limited to specific locations within those business districts, urban development areas, or areas zoned for commercial use where the Department of Transportation has determined that motor vehicle traffic flow and motorist and pedestrian safety on the state highway rights-of-way would not be adversely affected by the operation of the mobile food vendors. The Department of Transportation shall seek input from affected localities and other stakeholders during the process of amending the regulations authorized by this section. Such regulations shall allow localities to regulate the operation of such mobile food vending businesses located on the state highway rights-of-way within the locality in a manner consistent with local ordinances and the Commonwealth Transportation Board’s regulations and policies.”

§ 33.2-211.
Copies of regulations as evidence.

Copies of regulations of the Board and of additions or amendments thereto
printed under the authority of the Board shall be admissible in all of the courts
of the Commonwealth without further proof and given the force and effect prescribed hereby, and the fact that such printed copies bear the name of the
Board shall be prima facie evidence that they are duly adopted and promulgated
under the provisions of this title and that they are true copies of the
regulations, or of any additions and amendments thereto, adopted pursuant to
the provisions of subsection A of §

33.2-210

.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-21; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-22; 1974, c. 462; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-212.
Sections not applicable to certain engines and tractors.

The provisions of §§

33.2-210

and

33.2-211

shall not apply to traction engines and tractors weighing not less than five tons when drawing threshing machines, hay balers, or other farm machinery for local farm use.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-22; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-23; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2014, c. 805.

§ 33.2-213.
Naming highways, bridges, interchanges, and other transportation facilities.

The Board shall have the power and duty to give suitable names to state highways, bridges, interchanges, and other transportation facilities and change the names of any highways, bridges, interchanges, or other transportation facilities forming a part of the systems of state highways. The names of private entities, as defined in §

33.2-1800

, located within the Commonwealth shall not be used for such purposes unless such private entity pays the Department an annual naming rights fee as determined by the Board. The Department shall place and maintain appropriate signs indicating the names of highways, bridges, interchanges, and other transportation facilities named by the Board or by the General Assembly. The costs of producing, placing, and maintaining these signs shall be paid by the localities in which they are located or by the private entity whose name is attached to the highway, bridge, interchange, or other transportation facility. However, for a highway, bridge, interchange, or other transportation facility named after a state official killed during the performance of his official duties, the costs of producing, placing, and maintaining these signs shall be paid from Commonwealth Transportation Funds. For purposes of this section, “state official” includes law-enforcement officers employed by the Department of State Police and state highway transportation workers. No name shall be given to any state highway, bridge, interchange, or other transportation facility by the Board unless and until the Board receives (i) for a naming after a state official, a letter or resolution from the head of the state agency by which the state official was employed requesting such naming or (ii) for a naming other than after a state official, a resolution from the governing body of the locality within which a portion of the facility to be named is located requesting such naming, except in such cases where a private entity has requested the naming. No highway, bridge, interchange, or other transportation facility previously named by the Board or the General Assembly shall be eligible for renaming by a private entity, unless such naming incorporates the previous name. The Board shall develop and approve guidelines governing the naming of highways, bridges, interchanges, and other transportation facilities by private entities and the applicable fees for such naming rights. Such fees shall be deposited in the Highway Maintenance and Operating Fund established pursuant to §

33.2-1530

.

No name shall be eligible for the naming rights under this section if it in any way reasonably connotes anything that (i) is profane, obscene, or vulgar; (ii) is sexually explicit or graphic; (iii) is excretory related; (iv) is descriptive of intimate body parts or genitals; (v) is descriptive of illegal activities or substances; (vi) condones or encourages violence; or (vii) is socially, racially, or ethnically offensive or disparaging.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-12; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-12; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805; 2019, c. 802.

Cross references.

As to the naming of U.S. Route 29, see §

15.2-719.1

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 802, in the first paragraph, inserted the fifth and sixth sentences, and in the seventh sentence, inserted clauses (i) and (ii), and deleted “a resolution of that governing body” following “is located.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Naming of highways. —

The Virginia Commonwealth Transportation Board may change the name of a primary highway that was originally named by the General Assembly, thus portions of a highway that are located within a specific locality may be renamed, provided that the locality adopts a resolution requesting such renaming. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Mark H. Levine, Member, House of Delegates, 19-010, 2019 Va. AG LEXIS 7 (3/21/19).

§ 33.2-214.
Transportation; Six-Year Improvement Program.

The Board shall have the power and duty to monitor and, where necessary, approve actions taken by the Department of Rail and Public Transportation pursuant to Article 5 (§

33.2-281

et seq.) in order to ensure the efficient and economical development of public transportation, the enhancement of rail transportation, and the coordination of such rail and public transportation plans with highway programs.

The Board shall have the power and duty to coordinate the planning for financing of transportation needs, including needs for highways, railways, seaports, airports, and public transportation and set aside funds as provided in §

33.2-1524.1

. To allocate funds for these needs pursuant to §

33.2-358

and Chapter 15 (§

33.2-1500

et seq.), the Board shall adopt a Six-Year Improvement Program of anticipated projects and programs by July 1 of each year. This program shall be based on the most recent official Commonwealth Transportation Fund revenue forecast and shall be consistent with a debt management policy adopted by the Board in consultation with the Debt Capacity Advisory Committee and the Department of the Treasury.

The Board shall have the power and duty to enter into contracts with local districts, commissions, agencies, or other entities created for transportation purposes.

The Board shall have the power and duty to promote increasing private investment in the Commonwealth’s transportation infrastructure, including acquisition of causeways, bridges, tunnels, highways, and other transportation facilities.

The Board shall only include a project or program wholly or partially funded with funds from the State of Good Repair Program pursuant to §

33.2-369

, the High Priority Projects Program pursuant to §

33.2-370

, the Highway Construction District Grant Programs pursuant to §

33.2-371

, or the Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program pursuant to §

33.2-372

, or capital projects funded through the Virginia Highway Safety Improvement Program pursuant to §

33.2-373

in the Six-Year Improvement Program if the allocation of funds from those programs and other funding committed to such project or program within the six-year horizon of the Six-Year Improvement Program is sufficient to complete the project or program. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any project (i) the design and construction of which cannot be completed within six years, (ii) the estimated costs of which exceed $2 billion, and (iii) that requires the Board to exercise its authority to waive the funding cap pursuant to subsection B of §

33.2-369

.

The Board shall have the power and duty to integrate land use with transportation planning and programming, consistent with the efficient and economical use of public funds. If the Board determines that a local transportation plan described in §

15.2-2223

or any amendment as described in §

15.2-2229

or a metropolitan regional long-range transportation plan or regional Transportation Improvement Program as described in §

33.2-3201

is not consistent with the Board’s Statewide Transportation Plan developed pursuant to §

33.2-353

, the Six-Year Improvement Program adopted pursuant to subsection B, and the location of routes to be followed by roads comprising systems of state highways pursuant to subsection A of §

33.2-208

, the Board shall notify the locality of such inconsistency and request that the applicable plan or program be amended accordingly. If, after a reasonable time, the Board determines that there is a refusal to amend the plan or program, then the Board may reallocate funds that were allocated to the nonconforming project as permitted by state or federal law. However, the Board shall not reallocate any funds allocated pursuant to §

33.2-319

or

33.2-366

, based on a determination of inconsistency with the Board’s Statewide Transportation Plan or the Six-Year Improvement Program nor shall the Board reallocate any funds, allocated pursuant to subsection C or D of §

33.2-358

, from any projects on highways controlled by any county that has withdrawn, or elects to withdraw, from the secondary system of state highways based on a determination of inconsistency with the Board’s Statewide Transportation Plan or the Six-Year Improvement Program. If a locality or metropolitan planning organization requests the termination of a project, and the Department does not agree to the termination, or if a locality or metropolitan planning organization does not advance a project to the next phase of construction when requested by the Board and the Department has expended state or federal funds, the locality or the localities within the metropolitan planning organization may be required to reimburse the Department for all funds expended on the project. If, after design approval by the Chief Engineer of the Department, a locality or metropolitan planning organization requests alterations to a project that, in the aggregate, exceeds 10 percent of the total project costs, the locality or the localities within the metropolitan planning organization may be required to reimburse the Department for the additional project costs above the original estimates for making such alterations.

History.

Code 1950, § 33-12; 1956, c. 92; 1964, c. 265; 1970, c. 322, § 33.1-12; 1974, c. 462; 1977, c. 150; 1978, c. 650; 1986, Sp. Sess., c. 13; 1988, cc. 844, 903; 1989, c. 727; 1992, c. 167; 1995, c. 94; 2001, c. 349; 2003, cc. 281, 533, 560; 2004, c. 110; 2005, cc. 839, 919; 2006, cc. 197, 417, 833, 924; 2006, Sp. Sess. I, c. 8; 2007, c. 337; 2008, Sp. Sess. II, c. 5; 2009, cc. 670, 690; 2011, cc. 104, 164; 2012, cc. 729, 733; 2013, cc. 388, 569, 585, 646, 741; 2014, c. 805; 2015, c. 684; 2018, c. 828; 2019, cc. 83, 349; 2020, cc. 1230, 1275.

Cross references.

As to goals of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation, generally, see §

2.2-229

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 8 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§§

33.2-214

and

33.2-214.1

of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the expenditure of funds that are allocated by July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2020, cc. 1230 and
1275, cl. 11 provides: “That notwithstanding the provisions of this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board (i) shall take actions deemed necessary in fiscal years 2021, 2022 and 2023 to ensure appropriate coverage ratios for any outstanding debt backed by the Transportation Trust Fund and (ii) shall ensure funds for modal programs and the highway maintenance and operating fund are at least equal to the amounts provided for the six-year financial plan for the Commonwealth Transportation Fund as in effect on January 1, 2020.”

Acts
2020, c. 1289, as amended by Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 552, Item 430 O 1, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2022, provides: “1. Notwithstanding
§

33.2-214

, the Six-Year Improvement Program adopted June 19, 2019, and as amended shall remain in effect through June 30, 2021, or until a new Six-Year Improvement Program is adopted that is based on the official Commonwealth Transportation Fund revenue forecast reflecting the impacts of COVID-19 pandemic.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 in the fourth sentence of subsection E, deleted “33.2-348, 33.2-362” after “33.2-319” in the fourth sentence, and substituted “subsection C or D of” for “subdivision C 3 of.”

The 2018 amendments.

The 2018 amendment by c. 828 added subsection E and redesignated former subsection E as F.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendments by cc. 83 and 349 are identical, and added the second sentence to subsection E.

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendments by cc. 1230 and 1275 are identical, and substituted “§

33.2-1524.1

” for “§

33.2-1524

,” deleted “§§” preceding “§

33.2-358

,” inserted “Chapter 15 (§

33.2-1500

et seq.)” for “58.1-638,” inserted “Commonwealth” preceding “Transportation,” and deleted “Trust” preceding “Fund” in subsection B; deleted “or” following “§

33.2-370

” and inserted “or the Interstate Operations and Enhancement Program pursuant to §

33.2-372

, or capital projects funded through the Virginia Highway Safety Improvement Program pursuant to §

33.2-373

” following “§

33.2-371

” in subsection E.

§ 33.2-214.1.
Statewide prioritization process for project selection.

The General Assembly declares it to be in the public interest that a prioritization process for projects funded by the Commonwealth Transportation Board be developed and implemented to improve the efficiency and effectiveness of the state’s transportation system, transportation safety, transportation accessibility for people and freight, environmental quality, and economic development in the Commonwealth.

Subject to the limitations in subsection C, the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall develop, in accordance with federal transportation requirements, and in cooperation with metropolitan planning organizations wholly within the Commonwealth and with the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, a statewide prioritization process for the use of funds allocated pursuant to §§

33.2-358

,

33.2-370

, and

33.2-371

or apportioned pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 104. Such prioritization process shall be used for the development of the Six-Year Improvement Program pursuant to §

33.2-214

and shall consider, at a minimum, highway, transit, rail, roadway, technology operational improvements, and transportation demand management strategies.

The prioritization process shall be based on an objective and quantifiable analysis that considers, at a minimum, the following factors relative to the cost of the project or strategy: congestion mitigation, economic development, accessibility, safety, and environmental quality.

Prior to the analysis in subdivision 1, candidate projects and strategies shall be screened by the Commonwealth Transportation Board to determine whether they are consistent with the assessment of capacity needs for all for corridors of statewide significance, regional networks, and improvements to promote urban development areas established pursuant to §

15.2-2223.1

, undertaken in the Statewide Transportation Plan in accordance with §

33.2-353

.

The Commonwealth Transportation Board shall weight the factors used in subdivision 1 for each of the state’s highway construction districts. The Commonwealth Transportation Board may assign different weights to the factors, within each highway construction district, based on the unique needs and qualities of each highway construction district.

The Commonwealth Transportation Board shall solicit input from localities, metropolitan planning organizations, transit authorities, transportation authorities, and other stakeholders in its development of the prioritization process pursuant to this section. Further, the Board shall explicitly consider input provided by an applicable metropolitan planning organization or the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority when developing the weighting of factors pursuant to subdivision 3 for a metropolitan planning area with a population over 200,000 individuals.

The prioritization process developed under subsection B shall not apply to the following: projects or activities undertaken pursuant to §

33.2-352

; projects funded by the Congestion Mitigation Air Quality funds apportioned to the state pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 104(b)(4) and state matching funds; projects funded by the Highway Safety Improvement Program funds apportioned to the state pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 104(b)(3) and state matching funds; projects funded by the Transportation Alternatives funds set-aside pursuant to 23 U.S.C. § 213 and state matching funds; projects funded by the revenue-sharing program pursuant to §

33.2-357

; and projects funded by federal programs established by the federal government after June 30, 2014, with specific rules that restrict the types of projects that may be funded, excluding restrictions on the location of projects with regard to highway functional classification. The Commonwealth Transportation Board may, at its discretion, develop a prioritization process for any of the funds covered by this subsection, subject to planning and funding requirements of federal law.

History.

2014, c. 726; 2015, c. 684; 2016, c. 129; 2017, cc. 166, 273.

Cross references.

As to goals of the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment of the Secretary of Transportation, generally, see §

2.2-229

.

As to comprehensive plan prepared and adopted by local planning commission, see §

15.2-2223

.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2014, c. 726 enacted
§ 33.1-23.5:5 from which this section is derived. Pursuant to
§ 30-152, Acts
2014, c. 726 has been given as this section.

Acts
2014, c. 726, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall select projects for funding pursuant to the provisions of this act beginning July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2014, c. 726, cl. 3 provides: “That the prioritization process developed pursuant to
§ 33.1-23.5:5 [now this section] of the Code of Virginia, as created by this act, shall not apply to funds allocated to the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority Fund established pursuant to
§ 15.2-4838.01 of the Code of Virginia, the Hampton Roads Transportation Fund established pursuant to
§ 33.1-23.5:4 [now
§

33.2-2600

] of the Code of Virginia, or federal funds subject to
23 U.S.C. 133(d)(1)(A)(i).”

Acts
2014, c. 726, cl. 5 provides: “That the Commonwealth Transportation Board in implementing
§ 33.1-23.5:5 [now this section] as created by this act shall comply with the allocation of funds pursuant to
§ 33.1-23.1 [now
§

33.2-358

].”

Acts
2014, c. 726, cl. 6 provides: “That, for Northern Virginia and Hampton Roads highway construction districts, the Commonwealth Transportation Board, pursuant to subdivision B 3 of
§ 33.1-23.5:5 [now this section] as created by this act, shall ensure that congestion mitigation, consistent with
§ 33.1-13.03:1 [now
§

33.2-257

] of the Code of Virginia, is weighted highest among the factors in the prioritization process. For metropolitan planning areas with a population over 200,000, the prioritization process shall also include a factor based on the quantifiable and achievable goals pursuant to subsection B of
§ 33.1-23.03 of the Code of Virginia.”

Acts
2014, c. 726, cl. 7 provides: “That notwithstanding
§ 33.1-23.5:5 [now this section] as created by this act, the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall ensure that no project shall be undertaken primarily for economic development purposes.”

Acts
2015, c. 684, cl. 8 provides: “That the provisions of this act amending
§§

33.2-214

and

33.2-214.1

of the Code of Virginia shall not affect the expenditure of funds that are allocated by July 1, 2016.”

Acts
2018, Sp. Sess. I, c. 2, as amended by Acts
2019, c. 854, Item 449 D, effective for the biennium ending June 30, 2020, provides: “The prioritization process developed under
§

33.2-214.1

, Code of Virginia, shall not apply to use of funds provided in this Item from the federal apportionments in the State Planning and Research Program.”

The 2015 amendments.

The 2015 amendment by c. 684 in the first sentence of subsection B, substituted “§§

33.2-358

,

33.2-370

and

33.2-371

” for “§

33.2-358

”; in subsection C, deleted “projects funded pursuant to subdivisions C 2 and 3 of § 33.2-358” preceding “projects funded by the revenue-sharing program,” and deleted “However, the Board shall defer to individual local governments for projects funded pursuant to subdivisions C 2 and 3 of § 33.2-358” at the end.

The 2016 amendments.

The 2016 amendment by c. 129 substituted “and the criteria used to determine the value of each factor, no later than 30 days prior to a vote on such projects or strategies” for “in a timely fashion” in subsection D.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendments by cc. 166 and 273 are identical, and deleted subsection D, which read: “The Commonwealth Transportation Board shall make public, in an accessible format, the results of the screening and analysis of candidate projects and strategies under subsection B, including the weighting of factors and the criteria used to determine the value of each factor, no later than 30 days prior to a vote on such projects or strategies.”

§ 33.2-214.2.
Transparency in the development of the Six-Year Improvement Program, statewide prioritization process, and state of good repair program.

The Board shall develop the Six-Year Improvement Program pursuant to §

33.2-214

in a transparent manner that provides to the public, elected officials, and other stakeholders the opportunity to engage and comment in a meaningful manner prior to the adoption of such program.

No later than 150 days prior to a vote to include projects or strategies evaluated pursuant to §

33.2-214.1

in the Six-Year Improvement Program, the Office of Intermodal Planning and Investment shall make public, in an accessible format, (i) a recommended list of projects and strategies for inclusion in the Six-Year Improvement Program based on the results of such evaluation; (ii) the results of the screening of candidate projects and strategies, including whether such projects are located on a primary evacuation route; (iii) whether a project has been designed to be or the project sponsor has committed that the design will be resilient; and (iv) the results of the evaluation of candidate projects and strategies, including the weighting of factors and the criteria used to determine the value of each factor.

The Department shall make public a recommended list of projects eligible for funds under the state of good repair program pursuant to §

33.2-369

from the listing of prioritized pavement and bridge needs published in the Commissioner’s annual report pursuant to §

33.2-232

at least 150 days prior to the adoption of a Six-Year Improvement Program that includes new projects with funding from such program.

The Board may modify the recommended list of projects in subsection B or C through formal action.

History.

2017, cc. 166, 273; 2020, c. 971; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51, 52.

Editor’s note.

Acts
2021, Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51 and
52, cl. 2 provides: “That the Commissioner of Highways shall ensure resiliency is incorporated into the design standards for new construction projects.”

The 2020 amendments.

The 2020 amendment by c. 971, added “including whether such projects are located on a primary evacuation route” in subsection B to clause (ii) and made stylistic changes.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendments by Sp. Sess. I, cc. 51 and 52, effective July 1, 2021, are identical, and inserted clause (iii) and redesignated former clause (iii) as clause (iv) in subsection B.

§ 33.2-214.3.
Transparency in project selection in Planning District 8.

At least annually, the Northern Virginia Transportation Authority, the Northern Virginia Transportation Commission, the Virginia Railway Express, and the Commonwealth Transportation Board shall conduct a joint public meeting for the purposes of presenting to the public, and receiving public comments on, the transportation projects proposed and conducted by each entity in Planning District 8. Such presentation shall include documentation regarding how the combined project selection, timing, and revenue sources employed by the entities represents the most efficient use of revenue sources. Such presentation shall include any evaluations or analyses conducted by such entities pursuant to §

33.2-214.1

or subdivision 2 of §

33.2-2500

that relate to Planning District 8. Each entity shall have at least one designee physically assembled at such joint public meeting. Nothing herein shall require a quorum of each such entity to participate in such joint public meeting.

History.

2018, c. 640; 2019, c. 749.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 749 substituted “subdivision 2 of §

33.2-2500

” for “33.2-257.”